Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-746
Resolution; objections; effect.

If a petition opposing the resolution, signed by property owners representing a majority of the front footage which may become subject to assessment for the cost of any improvements as set forth by the resolution, is filed with the clerk of the district within three days before the date of the meeting for the hearing on such resolution, such resolution shall not be adopted.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 20, p. 203;

Laws 1955, c. 117, § 8, p. 316;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 14.